fst/interjections.lexc
! interjections — generated from Twanksta data
! Source: ../../data/external/twanksta_entries.json

LEXICON Interjections
  bēēē+IJ:bēēē  # ;
  mēēē+IJ:mēēē  # ;
  sandēi+IJ:sandēi  # ;
  ak+IJ:ak  # ;
  mīaū+IJ:mīaū  # ;
  klaps+IJ:klaps  # ;
  sprakst%!+IJ:sprakst%!  # ;
  kikkerikī+IJ:kikkerikī  # ;
  ījohō+IJ:ījohō  # ;
  kurre+IJ:kurre  # ;
  smit+IJ:smit  # ;
  krā+IJ:krā  # ;
  kurru+IJ:kurru  # ;
  šnurgt+IJ:šnurgt  # ;
  wōi+IJ:wōi  # ;
